src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IND_PRS_32_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.32@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.32@%>т%{АЯ%}нзат VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.32@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.32@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}нзат VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.32@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.32@%>т%{АЯ%}ндат VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_33
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.33@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.33@%>сы VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.33@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.33@%>сазо VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.33@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.33@%^RegrRaise%>сазо VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_34
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.34@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.34@%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.34@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.34@%^RegrRaise%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_35
 IND_PRS_35_VARIANTS ;
+Err/Orth-d:%^TD IND_PRS_35_VARIANTS ;
LEXICON IND_PRS_35_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.35@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.35@%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.35@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.35@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_36
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>сынзе VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>сынде VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>сындзе VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>сыньзе VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_40
 IND_PRS_40_VARIANTS ;
+Err/Orth-d:%^TD  IND_PRS_40_VARIANTS ; 
LEXICON IND_PRS_40_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>т%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>т%{АЯ%}м VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>т%{АЯ%}ма VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>т%{АЯ%}нк VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>т%{АЯ%}нок VerbEnd_deraj-lak ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}нок VerbEnd_deraj-lak ;
!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>TLossт%{АЯ%}но VerbEnd_deraj ;
!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/W+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>TLossт%{АЯ%}м VerbEnd_deraj ;
!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.40@%>TLossт%{АЯ%}нок VerbEnd_deraj-lak ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_42
 IND_PRS_42_VARIANTS ;
+Err/Orth-d:%^TD IND_PRS_42_VARIANTS ;
LEXICON IND_PRS_42_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.42@+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.42@%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.42@+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.42@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_43
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.43@+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.43@%>сынек VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_45
 IND_PRS_45_VARIANTS ;
+Err/Orth-d:%^TD IND_PRS_45_VARIANTS ;
LEXICON IND_PRS_45_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.45@+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.45@%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.45@+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.45@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_46
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.46@+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.46@%>сынек VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_50
 IND_PRS_50_VARIANTS ;
+Err/Orth-d:%^TD IND_PRS_50_VARIANTS ;
LEXICON IND_PRS_50_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@%>т%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@%>т%{АЯ%}тк VerbEnd_deraj ;
!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.50@%>TLossт%{АЯ%}до VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_51
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.51@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.51@%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.51@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.51@%^RegrRaise%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_53
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.53@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.53@%>сынк VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_54
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%^RegrRaise%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_56
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.56@+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.56@%>сынк VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_60
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.60@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.60@%>%{иы%}ть VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_61
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%^RegrRaise%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_62
 IND_PRS_62_VARIANTS ;
+Err/Orth-d:%^TD IND_PRS_62_VARIANTS ;
LEXICON IND_PRS_62_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.62@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.62@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_63
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.63@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.63@%>сызь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_64
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%^RegrRaise%>самизь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_65
 IND_PRS_65_VARIANTS ;
+Err/Orth-d:%^TD IND_PRS_65_VARIANTS ;
LEXICON IND_PRS_65_VARIANTS
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2+Dial/NW:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%^RegrRaise%>т%{АЯ%}дызь VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_66
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>сызь VerbEnd_deraj ;


LEXICON IND_PRT1_10
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.10@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.10@%{иы%}нь  VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_12
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.12@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.12@%{иы%}тинь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.12@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.12@%{иы%}тень VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_13
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.13@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.13@%{иы%}я VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.13@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.13@%{иы%}е VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.13@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/SE+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.13@%{иы%}ять VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_15
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.15@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.15@%{иы%}дизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.15@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.15@%{иы%}дезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_16
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.16@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.16@%{иы%}нь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_20
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.20@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.20@%{иы%}ть VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_21
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.21@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.21@%{иы%}мик VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.21@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.21@%{иы%}мек VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_23
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.23@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.23@%{иы%}к VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_24
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%{иы%}мизь VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%{иы%}мезь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_26
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.26@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.26@%{иы%}ть VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.26@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.26@%{иы%} VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_30
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.30@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.30@%>сь VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON IND_PRT1_30_ZERO
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.30@+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@@U.CONJ-PX.30@ VerbEnd_K ;
